Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1893.1] Periodic evaluation.
(a) Evaluations shall be conducted of the projects and activities funded by
the energy systems development special fund. Using objective criteria, the
evaluation shall assess the degree to which the projects and activities comport
with and achieve the stated objectives of the energy systems development
special fund pursuant to section 304A-2169.1.

(b) The initial evaluation shall be conducted
beginning July 1, 2017, and every three years thereafter by a two-person panel
of independent energy and environmental technical experts who shall be
appointed by the director of business, economic development, and tourism and
who shall not be affiliated with the Hawaii natural energy institute. The
panel shall submit a report of the findings and recommendations of each
evaluation to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening
of the following regular session. The Hawaii natural energy institute shall
cooperate with and provide support to the evaluation panel. [L 2014, c 107, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next